District of Columbia statutes.
37-131.05

Vending development zones.

The Mayor may establish vending development zones, upon application and after public notice, in which the Mayor may waive the regulatory provisions, such as the design standards, the standards for designation of vending locations, and the procedure for assigning vending locations, otherwise applicable to vendors; provided, that the Mayor shall establish, by rule, a procedure for reviewing applications for the establishment of a vending development zone.

Oct. 22, 2009, D.C. Law 18-71, § 6, 56 DCR 6619
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 10(a) of Vending Regulation Emergency Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-322, March 19, 2008, 55 DCR 3445).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 10(a) of Vending Regulation Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-9, January 29, 2009, 56 DCR 1638).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 10(a) of Vending Regulation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-47, April 27, 2009, 56 DCR 3574).